Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2029.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148E.060, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Students or persons not currently licensed in another jurisdiction. (a) To be issued a temporary license to practice social work, an applicant who is a student as defined in section 148E.010 or a person not licensed or credentialed to practice social work in any jurisdiction must provide evidence satisfactory to the board that the applicant: (1) has submitted a current application for a license under section 148E.055; (2) has submitted the required fees and documentation for the criminal background check according to section 214.075; deleted text begin (3) has passed the applicable licensure examination required in section 148E.055; deleted text end deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end has completed all requirements for a baccalaureate or graduate degree in social work from a program accredited by the Council on Social Work Education, the Canadian Association of Schools of Social Work, or a similar accrediting body that the board designates, or a doctorate in social work from an accredited university, including all coursework and internships required to obtain the degree; deleted text begin (5)deleted text end new text begin (4)new text end has submitted a completed, signed temporary license application form that the board has provided. For electronic applications, a "signed application" means providing an attestation that the board has specified; deleted text begin (6)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end has paid the fee specified in section 148E.180; and deleted text begin (7)deleted text end new text begin (6)new text end has not engaged in conduct that was or would be in violation of the standards of practice specified in sections 148E.195 to 148E.240. If the applicant has engaged in conduct that was or would be in violation of the standards of practice, the board may take action according to sections 148E.255 to 148E.270. (b) A temporary license is effective on the day that the board receives the application and fee or on the date that all requirements are complete as specified in this subdivision, whichever date is later. (c) A temporary license issued under this subdivision expires on the last day of the month six months from the effective date or when a license is issued under section 148E.055, whichever date is earlier. A temporary license is nonrenewable. (d) In all professional use of the social worker's name, an individual with a baccalaureate or graduate temporary license must represent themselves as a Temporary License Baccalaureate Social Worker or Temporary License Graduate Social Worker. An individual with a baccalaureate or graduate temporary license must not use the credentials LSW, LGSW, LISW, or LICSW until the individual is issued a license under section 148E.055. (e) An individual issued a baccalaureate temporary license under this subdivision is authorized to practice social work as described in section 148E.050, subdivision 2. An individual issued a graduate temporary license under this subdivision is authorized to practice social work as described in section 148E.050, subdivision 3. (f) An individual issued a temporary license under this subdivision must obtain supervision in compliance with sections 148E.100 to 148E.125. Supervised practice obtained with a temporary license applies to the supervised practice requirements for a license issued under section 148E.055. (g) An individual issued a temporary license under this subdivision may complete continuing education in compliance with the requirements of section 148E.130. Continuing education obtained with a temporary license may be applied to the continuing education requirements of a license issued under section 148E.055. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148E.060, subdivision 2a, is amended to read: Subd. 2a. Applicants graduating from programs in candidacy status. (a) To be issued a temporary license to practice social work, an applicant who is a student as defined in section 148E.010 or a graduate from a program in candidacy status with the Council on Social Work Education, the Canadian Association of Schools of Social Work, or a similar accrediting body that the board designates, must provide evidence satisfactory to the board that the applicant: (1) has a current application for a license under section 148E.055; (2) has submitted the required fees and documentation for the criminal background check according to section 214.075; deleted text begin (3) has passed the applicable licensure examination required in section 148E.055; deleted text end deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end has completed all requirements for a baccalaureate, graduate, or doctoral degree in social work from a program in candidacy status with the Council on Social Work Education, the Canadian Association of Schools of Social Work, or a similar accrediting body that the board designates, including all coursework and internships required to obtain the degree; deleted text begin (5)deleted text end new text begin (4)new text end has submitted a completed, signed temporary license application form that the board has provided. For electronic applications, a "signed application" means providing an attestation that the board has specified; deleted text begin (6)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end has paid the fee specified in section 148E.180; and deleted text begin (7)deleted text end new text begin (6)new text end has not engaged in conduct that is in violation of the standards of practice specified in sections 148E.195 to 148E.240. If the applicant has engaged in conduct that is in violation of the standards of practice, the board may take action according to sections 148E.255 to 148E.270. (b) A temporary license is effective on the day that the board receives the application and fee or on the date that all requirements are complete as specified in this subdivision, whichever date is later. (c) A temporary license issued under this subdivision expires on the last day of the month 12 months from the license's effective date or when a license is issued under section 148E.055, whichever date is earlier. A temporary license is nonrenewable. (d) A temporary license issued under this subdivision may be extended upon a showing that the social work program remains in candidacy status with the Council on Social Work Education, the Canadian Association of Schools of Social Work, or a similar accrediting body that the board designates. (e) In all professional use of the social worker's name, an individual with a baccalaureate or graduate temporary license must represent themselves as a Temporary License Baccalaureate Social Worker or Temporary License Graduate Social Worker. An individual with a baccalaureate or graduate temporary license must not use the credentials LSW, LGSW, LISW, or LICSW until the individual has a license under section 148E.055. (f) An individual who has a baccalaureate temporary license under this subdivision is authorized to practice social work as described in section 148E.050, subdivision 2. An individual who has a graduate temporary license under this subdivision is authorized to practice social work as described in section 148E.050, subdivision 3. (g) An individual issued a temporary license under this subdivision must obtain supervision in compliance with sections 148E.100 to 148E.125. Supervised practice obtained with a temporary license applies to the supervised practice requirements for a license issued under section 148E.055. (h) An individual who has a temporary license under this subdivision may complete continuing education in compliance with the requirements of section 148E.130. An individual who earns continuing education hours with a temporary license may apply those continuing education hours to the continuing education requirements of a license under section 148E.055. (i) If the Council on Social Work Education, the Canadian Association of Schools of Social Work, or a similar accrediting body that the board designates does not grant accreditation to the program in candidacy status, the board must immediately revoke the temporary license. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148E.120, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Supervisors licensed as social workers. (a) Except as provided in subdivision 2, to be eligible to provide supervision under this section, a social workernew text begin , including a social worker holding a provisional license,new text end must: (1) have completed 30 hours of training in supervision through coursework from an accredited college or university, or through continuing education in compliance with sections 148E.130 and 148E.145; (2) be competent in the activities being supervised; and (3) attest, on a form provided by the board, that the social worker has met the applicable requirements specified in this section and sections 148E.100 to 148E.115. The board may audit the information provided to determine compliance with the requirements of this section. (b) A licensed independent clinical social worker providing clinical licensing supervision to a licensed graduate social worker or a licensed independent social worker must have at least 2,000 hours of experience in authorized social work practice, including 1,000 hours of experience in clinical practice after obtaining a licensed independent clinical social worker license. (c) A licensed social worker, licensed graduate social worker, licensed independent social worker, or licensed independent clinical social worker providing nonclinical licensing supervision must have completed the supervised practice requirements specified in section 148E.100, 148E.105, 148E.106, 148E.110, or 148E.115, as applicable. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148E.126, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Supervision plan. (a) An applicant granted a provisional license must submit, on a form provided by the board, a supervision plan for meeting the supervision requirements in section 148E.116. (b) The supervision plan must be submitted no later than deleted text begin 30deleted text end new text begin 60new text end days after the licensee begins a social work practice position. (c) The supervision plan must include the following: (1) the name of the supervisee, the name of the agency in which the supervisee is being supervised, and the supervisee's position title; (2) the name and qualifications of the person providing the supervision; (3) the number of hours of one-on-one supervision and the number and type of additional hours of supervision to be completed by the supervisee; (4) the supervisee's position description; (5) a brief description of the supervision the supervisee will receive in the following content areas: (i) clinical practice, if applicable; (ii) development of professional social work knowledge, skills, and values; (iii) practice methods; (iv) authorized scope of practice; (v) ensuring continuing competence; and (vi) ethical standards of practice; and (6) if applicable, a detailed description of the supervisee's clinical social work practice, addressing: (i) the client population, the range of presenting issues, and the diagnoses; (ii) the clinical modalities that were utilized; and (iii) the process utilized for determining clinical diagnoses, including the diagnostic instruments used and the role of the supervisee in the diagnostic process. (d) The board must receive a revised supervision plan within deleted text begin 30deleted text end new text begin 60new text end days of any of the following changes: (1) the supervisee has a new supervisor; (2) the supervisee begins a new social work position; (3) the scope or content of the supervisee's social work practice changes substantially; (4) the number of practice or supervision hours changes substantially; or (5) the type of supervision changes as supervision is described in section 148E.116. (e) The board must approve the supervisor and the supervision plan.